Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-507
Works, defined.

Wherever the term works is used in sections 46-501 to 46-573, it shall, unless otherwise specified, be held to mean dams, storage reservoirs, compensatory and replacement reservoirs, canals, conduits, pipelines, tunnels, power plants, transmission lines, drainage canals, pumping plants, and all works, facilities, improvements and property necessary or convenient for the supplying, controlling and disposing of water for domestic, irrigation, power, milling, manufacturing, mining, metallurgical and any and all other beneficial uses.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 2(5), p. 525;

Laws 1951, c. 151, § 1, p. 599.